Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:(1) For health plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a health carrier shall provide coverage for all federal food and drug administration approved HIV antiviral drugs without prior authorization, step therapy, or any other utilization management protocols.(2) If the United States food and drug administration has approved one or more therapeutic equivalents of a drug, device, or product for the prevention or treatment of HIV, this section does not require a health plan to cover all of the therapeutically equivalent versions without prior authorization, step therapy, or any other utilization management protocols, if at least one therapeutically equivalent version is covered without prior authorization, step therapy, or any other utilization management protocols.Sec. 2. RCW 41.05.017 and 2025 c 389 s 3 and 2025 c 171 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Each health plan that provides medical insurance offered under this chapter, including plans created by insuring entities, plans not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW, and plans created under RCW 41.05.140, are subject to the provisions of RCW 48.43.500, 70.02.045, 48.43.505 through 48.43.535, 48.43.537, 48.43.545, 48.43.550, 70.02.110, 70.02.900, 48.43.190, 48.43.083, 48.43.0128, 48.43.780, 48.43.435, 48.43.815, 48.200.020 through 48.200.280, 48.200.300 through 48.200.320, 48.43.440, 48.43.845, 48.43.732, section 1 of this act, and chapter 48.49 RCW.--- END ---